Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-638
Manufacturer-distributor; information requirements.

Each manufacturer-distributor shall maintain the following information: (1) The name of each purchaser of lottery equipment or supplies; (2) relative to each sale, the quantity and type of lottery equipment or supplies sold; and (3) any other information concerning lottery equipment or supplies sold which the department deems necessary. Such information shall be made available to the department upon request.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 78;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 31.